Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.015

School boards of directors—Powers—Notice of adoption of policy.

(1) The board of directors of each school district may exercise the following:

(a) The broad discretionary power to determine and adopt written policies not in conflict with other law that provide for the development and implementation of programs, activities, services, or practices that the board determines will:

(i) Promote the education and daily physical activity of kindergarten through twelfth grade students in the public schools; or

(ii) Promote the effective, efficient, or safe management and operation of the school district;

(b) Such powers as are expressly authorized by law; and

(c) Such powers as are necessarily or fairly implied in the powers expressly authorized by law.

(2) Before adopting a policy under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the school district board of directors shall comply with the notice requirements of the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and shall in addition include in that notice a statement that sets forth or reasonably describes the proposed policy. The board of directors shall provide a reasonable opportunity for public written and oral comment and consideration of the comment by the board of directors.

[ 2005 c 360 s 7; 1992 c 141 s 301.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2005 c 360: See note following RCW 36.70A.070.

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See note following RCW 28A.410.040.